zh-CN: 开口渔坠形状: 球形; 圆柱形; 蛋形; 橄榄形; 椭圆形; 圆形; 泪滴形; 其他
sl-SI: Oblika deljenega svinca: Kroglica; Valj; Jajce; Nogometna žoga; Oval; Okrogla oblika; Solza; Drugo
ko: 조니 싱커 모양: 볼형; 원기둥형; 달걀형; 럭비공형; 타원형; 원형; 물방울형; 기타
sv: Form på delat sänke: Kula; Cylinder; Ägg; Fotboll; Oval; Rund; Droppformad; Annat
tr: Split kurşun şekli: Top; Silindir; Yumurta; Amerikan futbolu topu; Oval; Yuvarlak; Damla; Diğer
en: Split shot shape: Ball; Cylinder; Egg; Football; Oval; Round; Teardrop; Other
lt-LT: Skelto šratelio forma: Rutulys; Cilindras; Kiaušinio formos; Futbolo kamuolio formos; Ovalus; Apvalus; Ašaros formos; Kita
es: Forma del plomo partido: Bola; Cilindro; Huevo; Fútbol americano; Óvalo; Redondo; Lágrima; Otro
cs: Tvar rozděleného závaží: Kulička; Váleček; Vajíčko; Ragbyový míč; Ovál; Kulatý; Kapka; Jiné
pt-PT: Forma do chumbo split-shot: Bola; Cilindro; Ovo; Futebol; Oval; Redondo; Lágrima; Outro
nl: Vorm knijplood: Bal; Cilinder; Ei; Voetbal; Ovaal; Rond; Druppel; Overige
sk-SK: Tvar olovených brokov: Guľôčka; Valec; Vajce; Ragbyová lopta; Ovál; Okrúhly; Slza; Iný
hu: Hasított ólomsúly alakja: Golyó; Henger; Tojás; Rögbi; Ovális; Kerek; Csepp; Egyéb
de: Split-Shot-Form: Kugel; Zylinder; Ei; Football; Oval; Rund; Tropfen; Sonstige
bg-BG: Форма на сачмата със срязване: Топче; Цилиндър; Яйце; Футболна топка; Овал; Кръг; Сълза; Друго
ru: Форма разрезной дроби: Шар; Цилиндр; Яйцо; Оливка; Овал; Круглый; Капля; Другое
vi: Hình dạng tách rời: Viên bi; Hình trụ; Hình trứng; Quả bóng bầu dục; Hình bầu dục; Tròn; Hình giọt nước; Khác
da: Form på klemmesynk: Kugle; Cylinder; Æg; Fodbold; Oval; Rund; Dråbeformet; Andet
pt-BR: Formato de chumbada dividido: Bola; Cilindro; Ovo; Bola de futebol americano; Oval; Redondo; Gota; Outros
pl: Kształt śruciny split shot: Kula; Cylinder; Jajo; Piłka do rugby; Owal; Okrągły; Kropla; Inne
fi: Kalastuspainon muoto: Pallo; Sylinteri; Muna; Jalkapallo (amerikkalainen); Ovaali; Pyöreä; Pisara; Muu
fr: Forme du plomb fendu: Bille; Cylindre; Œuf; Football; Ovale; Rond; Goutte d’eau; Autre
nb: Form på splittlodd: Kule; Sylinder; Egg; Fotball; Oval; Rund; Dråpe; Annet
it: Forma Split shot: Sfera; Cilindro; Uovo; Football; Ovale; Rotondo; Goccia; Altro
el: Σχήμα βαριδιού ψαρέματος: Μπίλια; Κύλινδρος; Αυγό; Μπάλα αμερικανικού ποδοσφαίρου; Οβάλ; Στρογγυλό; Σταγόνα; Άλλο
ja: スプリットショット形状: ボール; シリンダー; エッグ; フットボール; オーバル; ラウンド; ティアドロップ; その他
ro-RO: Formă a plumbului despicat: Sferic; Cilindric; Ou; Minge de fotbal; Oval; Rotund; Lacrimă; Altele
hr-HR: Oblik split shot utega: Kugla; Valjak; Jaje; Lopta za ragbi; Oval; Okruglo; Suza; Ostalo
th: รูปทรงของตะกั่วเม็ดผ่าซีก: ทรงกลม; ทรงกระบอก; ทรงไข่; ทรงลูกฟุตบอล; ทรงรี; ทรงกลม; ทรงหยดน้ำ; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 咬鉛形狀: 球形; 圓柱形; 蛋形; 橄欖球形; 橢圓形; 圓形; 淚滴形; 其他